District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.09

Requirements.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a transfer on death deed shall contain the essential elements and formalities of a properly recordable inter vivos deed.

(b)

A transfer on death deed shall state that the transfer to the designated beneficiary is to occur at the transferor’s death.

(c)

A transfer on death deed shall be recorded before the transferor’s death in the Office of Recorder of Deeds.

History

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606